Washington statutes.
RCW 7.100.060

Notice to grantee of trustee's deed or sheriff's deed of nuisance—Failure to abate.

(1) When a property has been the subject of foreclosure, a county, city or town may notify the grantee of the trustee's deed or sheriff's deed, via certified mail, that a property is a nuisance. Upon receipt of such a notice, the grantee of the trustee's deed or sheriff's deed shall respond within fifteen calendar days and provide one of the following responses:

(a) That the grantee of the trustee's deed or sheriff's deed will abate the nuisance within the time prescribed by local ordinance; or

(b) That the grantee of the trustee's deed or sheriff's deed does not have adequate resources to abate the nuisance within the time limits required by local ordinance.

(2) If the grantee of the trustee's deed or sheriff's deed is notified and does not abate the nuisance within the time prescribed by local ordinance, a county, city, or town may exercise its authority under chapter 7.48 RCW, RCW 35.22.280, 35.23.440, 35.27.410, 36.32.120, or any other applicable law to abate the nuisance and recover associated costs as set forth in RCW 7.100.070.

[ 2018 c 306 s 15.]